Oklahoma, session 2025, SB308.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2355, as


last amended by Section 1, Chapter 27, 1st Extraordinary Session,


O.S.L. 2023 (68 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 2355), is amended to read


as follows:


Section 2355. A. Individuals. For all taxable years beginning


after December 31, 1998, and before January 1, 2006, a tax is hereby


imposed upon the Oklahoma taxable income of every resident or


nonresident individual, which tax shall be computed at the option of


the taxpayer under one of the two following methods:


1. METHOD 1.



Req. No. 1410 Page 1


a. Single individuals and married individuals filing


separately not deducting federal income tax:


(1) 1/2% tax on first $1,000.00 or part thereof,


(2) 1% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(3) 2% tax on next $1,250.00 or part thereof,


(4) 3% tax on next $1,150.00 or part thereof,


(5) 4% tax on next $1,300.00 or part thereof,


(6) 5% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(7) 6% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof, and


(8) (a) for taxable years beginning after December


31, 1998, and before January 1, 2002, 6.75%


tax on the remainder,


(b) for taxable years beginning on or after


January 1, 2002, and before January 1, 2004,


7% tax on the remainder, and


(c) for taxable years beginning on or after


January 1, 2004, 6.65% tax on the remainder.


b. Married individuals filing jointly and surviving


spouse to the extent and in the manner that a


surviving spouse is permitted to file a joint return


under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of


1986, as amended, and heads of households as defined


in the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, not


deducting federal income tax:

Req. No. 1410 Page 2


(1) 1/2% tax on first $2,000.00 or part thereof,


(2) 1% tax on next $3,000.00 or part thereof,


(3) 2% tax on next $2,500.00 or part thereof,


(4) 3% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof,


(5) 4% tax on next $2,400.00 or part thereof,


(6) 5% tax on next $2,800.00 or part thereof,


(7) 6% tax on next $6,000.00 or part thereof, and


(8) (a) for taxable years beginning after December


31, 1998, and before January 1, 2002, 6.75%


tax on the remainder,


(b) for taxable years beginning on or after


January 1, 2002, and before January 1, 2004,


7% tax on the remainder, and


(c) for taxable years beginning on or after


January 1, 2004, 6.65% tax on the remainder.


2. METHOD 2.


a. Single individuals and married individuals filing


separately deducting federal income tax:


(1) 1/2% tax on first $1,000.00 or part thereof,


(2) 1% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(3) 2% tax on next $1,250.00 or part thereof,


(4) 3% tax on next $1,150.00 or part thereof,


(5) 4% tax on next $1,200.00 or part thereof,


(6) 5% tax on next $1,400.00 or part thereof,

Req. No. 1410 Page 3


(7) 6% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(8) 7% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(9) 8% tax on next $2,000.00 or part thereof,


(10) 9% tax on next $3,500.00 or part thereof, and


(11) 10% tax on the remainder.


b. Married individuals filing jointly and surviving


spouse to the extent and in the manner that a


surviving spouse is permitted to file a joint return


under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of


1986, as amended, and heads of households as defined


in the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,


deducting federal income tax:


(1) 1/2% tax on the first $2,000.00 or part thereof,


(2) 1% tax on the next $3,000.00 or part thereof,


(3) 2% tax on the next $2,500.00 or part thereof,


(4) 3% tax on the next $1,400.00 or part thereof,


(5) 4% tax on the next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(6) 5% tax on the next $1,600.00 or part thereof,


(7) 6% tax on the next $1,250.00 or part thereof,


(8) 7% tax on the next $1,750.00 or part thereof,


(9) 8% tax on the next $3,000.00 or part thereof,


(10) 9% tax on the next $6,000.00 or part thereof, and


(11) 10% tax on the remainder.



Req. No. 1410 Page 4


B. Individuals. For all taxable years beginning on or after


January 1, 2008, and ending any tax year which begins after December


31, 2015, for which the determination required pursuant to Sections


2355.1F and 5 2355.1G of this act title is made by the State Board


of Equalization, a tax is hereby imposed upon the Oklahoma taxable


income of every resident or nonresident individual, which tax shall


be computed as follows:


1. Single individuals and married individuals filing


separately:


(a) 1/2% tax on first $1,000.00 or part thereof,


(b) 1% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(c) 2% tax on next $1,250.00 or part thereof,


(d) 3% tax on next $1,150.00 or part thereof,


(e) 4% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof,


(f) 5% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(g) 5.50% tax on the remainder for the 2008 tax year and


any subsequent tax year unless the rate prescribed by


subparagraph (h) of this paragraph is in effect, and


(h) 5.25% tax on the remainder for the 2009 and subsequent


tax years. The decrease in the top marginal


individual income tax rate otherwise authorized by


this subparagraph shall be contingent upon the


determination required to be made by the State Board



Req. No. 1410 Page 5


of Equalization pursuant to Section 2355.1A of this


title.


2. Married individuals filing jointly and surviving spouse to


the extent and in the manner that a surviving spouse is permitted to


file a joint return under the provisions of the Internal Revenue


Code of 1986, as amended, and heads of households as defined in the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended:


(a) 1/2% tax on first $2,000.00 or part thereof,


(b) 1% tax on next $3,000.00 or part thereof,


(c) 2% tax on next $2,500.00 or part thereof,


(d) 3% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof,


(e) 4% tax on next $2,400.00 or part thereof,


(f) 5% tax on next $2,800.00 or part thereof,


(g) 5.50% tax on the remainder for the 2008 tax year and


any subsequent tax year unless the rate prescribed by


subparagraph (h) of this paragraph is in effect, and


(h) 5.25% tax on the remainder for the 2009 and subsequent


tax years. The decrease in the top marginal


individual income tax rate otherwise authorized by


this subparagraph shall be contingent upon the


determination required to be made by the State Board


of Equalization pursuant to Section 2355.1A of this


title.



Req. No. 1410 Page 6


C. Individuals. For all taxable years beginning on or after


January 1, 2024 tax year 2024, a tax is hereby imposed upon the


Oklahoma taxable income of every resident or nonresident individual,


which tax shall be computed as follows:


1. Single individuals and married individuals filing


separately:


(a) 0.25% tax on first $1,000.00 or part thereof,


(b) 0.75% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(c) 1.75% tax on next $1,250.00 or part thereof,


(d) 2.75% tax on next $1,150.00 or part thereof,


(e) 3.75% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof, and


(f) 4.75% tax on the remainder.


2. Married individuals filing jointly and surviving spouse to


the extent and in the manner that a surviving spouse is permitted to


file a joint return under the provisions of the Internal Revenue


Code of 1986, as amended, and heads of households as defined in the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended:


(a) 0.25% tax on first $2,000.00 or part thereof,


(b) 0.75% tax on next $3,000.00 or part thereof,


(c) 1.75% tax on next $2,500.00 or part thereof,


(d) 2.75% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof,


(e) 3.75% tax on next $4,600.00 or part thereof, and


(f) 4.75% tax on the remainder.



Req. No. 1410 Page 7


No deduction for federal income taxes paid shall be allowed to


any taxpayer to arrive at taxable income.


D. Individuals. For tax year 2025, a tax is hereby imposed


upon the Oklahoma taxable income of every resident or nonresident


individual, which tax shall be computed as follows:


1. Single individuals and married individuals filing


separately:


(a) 0.00% tax on first $2,500.00 or part thereof,


(b) 0.75% tax on next $1,250.00 or part thereof,


(c) 1.75% tax on next $1,150.00 or part thereof,


(d) 2.75% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof, and


(e) 3.75% tax on the remainder.


2. Married individuals filing jointly and surviving spouse to


the extent and in the manner that a surviving spouse is permitted to


file a joint return under the provisions of the Internal Revenue


Code of 1986, as amended, and heads of households as defined in the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended:


(a) 0.00% tax on first $5,000.00 or part thereof,


(b) 0.75% tax on next $2,500.00 or part thereof,


(c) 1.75% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof,


(d) 2.75% tax on next $4,600.00 or part thereof, and


(e) 3.75% tax on the remainder.


No deduction for federal income taxes paid shall be allowed to


any taxpayer to arrive at taxable income.

Req. No. 1410 Page 8


E. Individuals. For tax year 2026, a tax is hereby imposed


upon the Oklahoma taxable income of every resident or nonresident


individual, which tax shall be computed as follows:


1. Single individuals and married individuals filing


separately:


(a) 0.00% tax on first $3,750.00 or part thereof,


(b) 0.75% tax on next $1,150.00 or part thereof,


(c) 1.75% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof, and


(d) 2.75% tax on the remainder.


2. Married individuals filing jointly and surviving spouse to


the extent and in the manner that a surviving spouse is permitted to


file a joint return under the provisions of the Internal Revenue


Code of 1986, as amended, and heads of households as defined in the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended:


(a) 0.00% tax on first $7,500.00 or part thereof,


(b) 0.75% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof,


(c) 1.75% tax on next $4,600.00 or part thereof, and


(d) 2.75% tax on the remainder.


No deduction for federal income taxes paid shall be allowed to


any taxpayer to arrive at taxable income.


F. Individuals. For tax year 2027, a tax is hereby imposed


upon the Oklahoma taxable income of every resident or nonresident


individual, which tax shall be computed as follows:



Req. No. 1410 Page 9


1. Single individuals and married individuals filing


separately:


(a) 0.00% tax on first $4,900.00 or part thereof,


(b) 0.75% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof, and


(c) 1.75% tax on the remainder.


2. Married individuals filing jointly and surviving spouse to


the extent and in the manner that a surviving spouse is permitted to


file a joint return under the provisions of the Internal Revenue


Code of 1986, as amended, and heads of households as defined in the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended:


(a) 0.00% tax on first $9,800.00 or part thereof,


(b) 0.75% tax on next $4,600.00 or part thereof, and


(c) 1.75% tax on the remainder.


No deduction for federal income taxes paid shall be allowed to


any taxpayer to arrive at taxable income.


G. Individuals. For tax year 2028, a tax is hereby imposed


upon the Oklahoma taxable income of every resident or nonresident


individual, which tax shall be computed as follows:


1. Single individuals and married individuals filing


separately:


(a) 0.00% tax on first $7,200.00 or part thereof, and


(b) 0.75% tax on the remainder.


2. Married individuals filing jointly and surviving spouse to


the extent and in the manner that a surviving spouse is permitted to

Req. No. 1410 Page 10


file a joint return under the provisions of the Internal Revenue


Code of 1986, as amended, and heads of households as defined in the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended:


(a) 0.00% tax on first $14,400.00 or part thereof, and


(b) 0.75% tax on the remainder.


No deduction for federal income taxes paid shall be allowed to


any taxpayer to arrive at taxable income.


H. For tax year 2029 and subsequent tax years, there shall be


no tax imposed upon the Oklahoma taxable income of any resident or


nonresident individual.


I. Nonresident aliens. In lieu of the rates set forth in


subsection A above, there shall be imposed on nonresident aliens, as


defined in the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, a tax of


eight percent (8%) instead of thirty percent (30%) as used in the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, with respect to the


Oklahoma taxable income of such nonresident aliens as determined


under the provision of the Oklahoma Income Tax Act.


Every payer of amounts covered by this subsection shall deduct


and withhold from such amounts paid each payee an amount equal to


eight percent (8%) thereof. Every payer required to deduct and


withhold taxes under this subsection shall for each quarterly period


on or before the last day of the month following the close of each


such quarterly period, pay over the amount so withheld as taxes to


the Oklahoma Tax Commission, and shall file a return with each such

Req. No. 1410 Page 11


payment. Such return shall be in such form as the Tax Commission


shall prescribe. Every payer required under this subsection to


deduct and withhold a tax from a payee shall, as to the total


amounts paid to each payee during the calendar year, furnish to such


payee, on or before January 31, of the succeeding year, a written


statement showing the name of the payer, the name of the payee and


the payee’s Social Security account number, if any, the total amount


paid subject to taxation, and the total amount deducted and withheld


as tax and such other information as the Tax Commission may require.


Any payer who fails to withhold or pay to the Tax Commission any


sums herein required to be withheld or paid shall be personally and


individually liable therefor to the State of Oklahoma.


E. J. Corporations. For all taxable years beginning after


December 31, 2021, a tax is hereby imposed upon the Oklahoma taxable


income of every corporation doing business within this state or


deriving income from sources within this state in an amount equal to


four percent (4%) thereof.


There shall be no additional Oklahoma income tax imposed on


accumulated taxable income or on undistributed personal holding


company income as those terms are defined in the Internal Revenue


Code of 1986, as amended.


F. K. Certain foreign corporations. In lieu of the tax imposed


in the first paragraph of subsection D J of this section, for all


taxable years beginning after December 31, 2021, there shall be

Req. No. 1410 Page 12


imposed on foreign corporations, as defined in the Internal Revenue


Code of 1986, as amended, a tax of four percent (4%) instead of


thirty percent (30%) as used in the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,


as amended, where such income is received from sources within


Oklahoma this state, in accordance with the provisions of the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and the Oklahoma Income


Tax Act.


Every payer of amounts covered by this subsection shall deduct


and withhold from such amounts paid each payee an amount equal to


four percent (4%) thereof. Every payer required to deduct and


withhold taxes under this subsection shall for each quarterly period


on or before the last day of the month following the close of each


such quarterly period, pay over the amount so withheld as taxes to


the Tax Commission, and shall file a return with each such payment.


Such return shall be in such form as the Tax Commission shall


prescribe. Every payer required under this subsection to deduct and


withhold a tax from a payee shall, as to the total amounts paid to


each payee during the calendar year, furnish to such payee, on or


before January 31, of the succeeding year, a written statement


showing the name of the payer, the name of the payee and the payee’s


Social Security account number, if any, the total amounts paid


subject to taxation, the total amount deducted and withheld as tax,


and such other information as the Tax Commission may require. Any


payer who fails to withhold or pay to the Tax Commission any sums

Req. No. 1410 Page 13


herein required to be withheld or paid shall be personally and


individually liable therefor to the State of Oklahoma.


G. L. Fiduciaries. A tax is hereby imposed upon the Oklahoma


taxable income of every trust and estate at the same rates as are


provided in subsection B or C subsections B through H of this


section for single individuals. Fiduciaries are not allowed a


deduction for any federal income tax paid.


H. M. Tax rate tables. For all taxable years beginning after


December 31, 1991, in lieu of the tax imposed by subsection A, B or


C subsections A through G of this section, as applicable there is


hereby imposed for each taxable year on the taxable income of every


individual, whose taxable income for such taxable year does not


exceed the ceiling amount, a tax determined under tables, applicable


to such taxable year which shall be prescribed by the Tax Commission


and which shall be in such form as it determines appropriate. In


the table so prescribed, the amounts of the tax shall be computed on


the basis of the rates prescribed by subsection A, B or C


subsections A through G of this section. For purposes of this


subsection, the term “ceiling amount” means, with respect to any


taxpayer, the amount determined by the Tax Commission for the tax


rate category in which such taxpayer falls.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1410 QD 12/30/2024 11:54:14 PM

Req. No. 1410 Page 14